Utah statutes.
76-9-702.3.   Public urination.

(1)  A person is guilty of public urination if the person urinates or defecates:

(a)  in a public place, other than a public rest room; and

(b)  under circumstances which the person should know will likely cause affront or alarm to another.

(2)  Public urination is a class C misdemeanor.

